Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 24

Department of the Treasury

4-3-2401. Creation — State treasurer as chief officer.

There is created the department of the treasury through which the state treasurer, who shall be the chief officer of the department, shall administer the duties imposed upon the state treasurer by law.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 9; T.C.A., § 4-339; modified.

Cross-References. Administration of board of claims, §§9-8-101,9-8-102.

State treasurer as constitutional officer, appointment, Tenn. Const., art. VII, § 3.

4-3-2402. Department and treasurer subject to general laws.

The state treasurer, as the chief officer of the department, and the department shall be subject to all laws applying generally to heads of administrative departments and to administrative departments, not inconsistent with the state treasurer's status as a constitutional officer.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 9; T.C.A., § 4-339.

4-3-2403. Division of retirement — Retirement systems attached to division.

A division of retirement is hereby created in the department of the treasury.

The division shall attend to all duties heretofore performed by the personnel of such retirement systems as shall by law be attached to it, except those discretionary duties performed directly by the boards administering such retirement systems.

The authority of retirement systems attached to the division of retirement to employ personnel is hereby abolished, but the authority of boards administering retirement systems is not otherwise impaired hereby.

The following retirement systems are hereby attached to the division of retirement:

The Tennessee consolidated retirement system;

The Tennessee teachers' retirement system;

The Tennessee state retirement system;

The attorneys general retirement system of Tennessee; and

The Tennessee judges' retirement system.

Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 9; impl. am. Acts 1969, ch. 209, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1969, ch. 210, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-340; Acts 1983, ch. 342, § 1; 2013, ch. 170, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. The retirement systems specified in subsection (b) have been repealed or superseded, but remain effective to define and protect existing rights. See the Appendix (“Superseded Retirement Systems”) to title 8.

Cross-References. Reorganization of divisions, §4-4-101.

4-3-2404. State building commission personnel.

There shall be attached to the department of treasury personnel employed by the state building commission for all administrative purposes, except the discharge of the duties and functions directly required of such personnel by the state building commission.

Acts 2017, ch. 87, § 2.